Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 27 Sanitation in Food Establishments

21-27-1.
Definitions.

Unless otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, the following definitions apply to this chapter:

“Approved” means approved by the director.

“Commissary” means an operating base location to which a mobile food establishment or transportation vehicle returns regularly for such things as food preparation, food storage, vehicle and equipment cleaning, discharging liquid or solid wastes, refilling water tanks and ice bins.

“Cottage food manufacture” means the production in accordance with the requirements of §

21-27-6.2

of allowable foods for retail sale directly to the consumer in a residential kitchen or a rented commercial kitchen licensed by the department.

“Cultural heritage education facility” means a facility for up to ten (10) individuals who, for a fee, participate in the preparation and consumption of food, limited to an owner-occupied site documented to be at least one hundred and fifty (150) years old and whose drinking water shall be obtained from an approved source that meets all of the requirements of chapter 13 of title 46.

“Department” means the department of health.

“Director” means the director of health or the director’s duly appointed agents.

“Farmers market” means a market where two (2) or more farmers are selling produce exclusively grown on their own farms on a retail basis to consumers. Excluded from this term is any market where farmers or others are selling produce at wholesale and/or any market in which any individual is selling produce not grown on his or her own farm.

“Farm home food manufacture” means the production in accordance with the requirements of §

21-27-6.1

of food for retail sale in a residential kitchen on a farm that produces agricultural products for human consumption and the operator of which is eligible for exemption from the sales and use tax in accordance with §

44-18-30(32)

.

“Food” means: (i) Articles used for food or drink for people or other animals; (ii) Chewing gum; and (iii) Articles used for components of any food or drink article.

“Food business” means and includes any establishment or place, whether fixed or mobile, where food or ice is held, processed, manufactured, packaged, prepared, displayed, served, transported, or sold.

“Food service establishment” means any fixed or mobile restaurant, coffee shop, cafeteria, short-order cafe, luncheonette, grill, tearoom, sandwich shop, soda fountain, tavern; bar, cocktail lounge, night club, roadside stand, industrial feeding establishment, cultural heritage education facility, private, public or nonprofit organization or institution routinely serving food, catering kitchen, commissary or similar place in which food or drink is prepared for sale or for service on the premises or elsewhere, and any other eating or drinking establishment or operation where food is served or provided for the public with or without charge.

“Mobile food service unit” means a unit that prepares and/or sells food products for direct consumption.

“Operator” in relation to food vending machines means any person who by contract, agreement, lease, rental, or ownership sells food from vending machines.

“Person” means any individual, firm, co-partnership, association, or private or municipal corporation.

“Processor” means one who combines, handles, manufactures or prepares, packages, and stores food products.

“Retail” means when eighty percent (80%) or more of sales are made directly to consumers.

“Retail peddler” means a food business that sells meat, seafood, and dairy products directly to the consumer, house to house, or in a neighborhood.

“Roadside farmstand” means a stand or location adjacent to a farm where produce grown only on that farm is sold at the time of harvest.

“Vending machine site or location” means the room, enclosure, space, or area where one or more vending machines are installed and/or operated.

“Warehouse” means a place for the storage of dried, fresh, or frozen food or food products, not including those areas associated within or directly part of a food service establishment or retail market.

“Wholesale” means when eighty percent (80%) or more of the business is for resale purposes.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 260, § 1; P.L. 1948, ch. 2026, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-27-1

; P.L. 1970, ch. 143, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 128, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 51, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 55, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 415, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 410, § 11; P.L. 2007, ch. 379, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 530, § 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 117, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 175, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 9, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

21-27-2.
Food businesses required to comply.

No person shall operate any food business within this state except in compliance with the provisions of this chapter and the regulations adopted in accordance with this chapter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 260, § 2, as enacted by P.L. 1948, ch. 2026, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-27-2

.

21-27-3.
Sanitary regulations.

The director shall adopt any regulations relating to sanitation that he or she may deem advisable with reference to any food business and with reference to the premises, property, equipment, and utensils used in connection with any food business.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 260, § 3; P.L. 1948, ch. 2026, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-27-3

.

21-27-4.
Sale of food not handled in compliance with chapter prohibited — Confiscation.

No person shall sell or possess with intent to sell within this state for human consumption any food which has not been processed, transported, or sold in compliance with the provisions of this chapter and the regulations adopted in accordance with this chapter. Any food which the director shall have reasonable cause to believe has not been processed, transported, or sold in compliance with the provisions of this chapter and the regulations adopted in accordance with this chapter may be confiscated.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 260, § 4; P.L. 1948, ch. 2026, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-27-4

.

21-27-5.
Notice to cease business.

Whenever the director deems it necessary in the interests of public health to cause any food business to cease operating the director may do so by serving written notice upon the owner or manager of the food business; provided, that before the notice is given the owner or manager shall have been given an opportunity to show cause why the food business should not cease operating. Written notice to cease operating a food business shall remain in effect until the director serves further notice permitting the resumption of operation of the food business. The director may obtain relief in equity or by prerogative writ whenever this relief shall be necessary in the proper performance of his or her duties under this section.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 260, § 5; P.L. 1948, ch. 2026, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-27-5

.

21-27-6.
Businesses exempt.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to those activities of food business which are licensed and regulated in accordance with the provisions of this title; provided, that retail food businesses and food vending machines limited solely to selling or dispensing ice and/or non-perishable foods, including, but not limited to, gumballs, unopened bottled or canned beverages, and prepackaged candy, nuts, gum, popcorn, chips, pretzels, cookies, and crackers. Honey producers who are registered with the state are exempt from the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 260, § 6; P.L. 1948, ch. 2026, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-27-6

; impl. am. P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 5; P.L. 1984, ch. 51, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 237, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 276, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 55, § 1.

21-27-6.1.
Farm home food manufacture.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this chapter, the department of health shall permit farm home food manufacture and the sale of the products of farm home food manufacture at farmers’ markets, farmstands, and other markets and stores operated by farmers for the purpose of the retail sale of the products of Rhode Island farms, provided that the requirements of this section are met.

The farm home food products shall be produced in a kitchen that is on the premises of a farm and meets the standards for kitchens as provided for in minimum housing standards, adopted pursuant to chapter 24.2 of title 45 and the Housing Maintenance and Occupancy Code, adopted pursuant to chapter 24.3 of title 45, and in addition the kitchen shall:

Be equipped at minimum with either a two (2) compartment sink or a dishwasher that reaches one hundred fifty degrees Fahrenheit (150° F) after the final rinse and drying cycle and a one compartment sink;

Have sufficient area or facilities, such as portable dish tubs and drain boards, for the proper handling of soiled utensils prior to washing and of cleaned utensils after washing so as not to interfere with safe food handling; equipment, utensils, and tableware shall be air dried;

Have drain boards and food preparation surfaces that shall be of a nonabsorbent, corrosion resistant material such as stainless steel, formica or other chip resistant, nonpitted surface;

Have self-closing doors for bathrooms that open directly into the kitchen;

If farm is on private water supply it must be tested once per year.

The farm home food products are prepared and produced ready for sale under the following conditions:

Pets are kept out of food preparation and food storage areas at all times;

Cooking facilities shall not be used for domestic food purposes while farm home food products are being prepared;

Garbage is placed and stored in impervious covered receptacles before it is removed from the kitchen, which removal shall be at least once each day that the kitchen is used for farm home food manufacture;

Any laundry facilities which may be in the kitchen shall not be used during farm home food manufacture;

Recipe(s) for each farm home food product with all the ingredients and quantities listed, and processing times and procedures, are maintained in the kitchen for review and inspection;

List ingredients on product;

Label with farm name, address and telephone number.

Farm home food manufacture shall be limited to the production of nonpotentially hazardous food and foods that do not require refrigeration, including:

Jams, jellies, preserves and acid foods, such as vinegars, that are prepared using fruits, vegetables and/or herbs that have been grown locally;

Double crust pies that are made with fruit grown locally;

Yeast breads;

Maple syrup from the sap of trees on the farm or of trees within a twenty (20) mile radius of the farm;

Candies and fudges;

Dried herbs and spices.

Each farm home kitchen shall be registered with the department of health and shall require a notarized affidavit of compliance, in any form that the department may require, from the owner of the farm that the requirements of this section have been met and the operation of the kitchen shall be in conformity with the requirements of this section. A certificate of registration shall be issued by the department upon the payment of a fee as set forth in §

23-1-54

and the submission of an affidavit of compliance. The certificate of registration shall be valid for one year after the date of issuance; provided, however, that the certificate may be revoked by the director at any time for noncompliance with the requirements of the section. The certificate of registration, with a copy of the affidavit of compliance, shall be kept in the kitchen where the farm home food manufacture takes place. The director of health shall have the authority to develop and issue a standard form for the affidavit of compliance to be used by persons applying for a certificate of registration; the form shall impose no requirements or certifications beyond those set forth in this section and §

21-27-1(8)

. No certificates of registration shall be issued by the department prior to September 1, 2002.

Income from farm home food manufacture shall not be included in the calculation of farm income for the purposes of obtaining an exemption from the sales and use tax pursuant to §

44-18-30(32)

, nor shall any equipment, utensils, or supplies acquired for the purpose of creating or operating farm home food manufacture be exempt from the sales and use tax as provided for in §

44-18-30(32)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 415, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 410, § 11; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 39, § 41; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 9, § 34.

21-27-6.2.
Cottage food manufacture.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this chapter, the department of health shall register cottage food manufacture and the sale of the products of cottage food manufacture direct to consumers whether by pickup or delivery within the state, provided that the requirements of this section are met.

The cottage food products shall be produced in a kitchen that is on the premises of a home and meets the standards for kitchens as provided for in minimum housing standards, adopted pursuant to chapter 24.2 of title 45 and the Housing Maintenance and Occupancy Code, adopted pursuant to chapter 24.3 of title 45, and in addition the kitchen shall:

Be equipped at minimum with either a two (2) compartment sink or a dishwasher that reaches one hundred fifty degrees Fahrenheit (150° F) after the final rinse and drying cycle and a one compartment sink;

Have sufficient area or facilities, such as portable dish tubs and drain boards, for the proper handling of soiled utensils prior to washing and of cleaned utensils after washing so as not to interfere with safe food handling; equipment, utensils, and tableware shall be air dried;

Have drain boards and food preparation surfaces that shall be of a nonabsorbent, corrosion resistant material such as stainless steel, formica, or other chip resistant, nonpitted surface;

Have self-closing doors for bathrooms that open directly into the kitchen;

If the home is on private water supply, the water supply must be tested once per year;

Notwithstanding this subsection, the cottage food products may also be produced in a commercial kitchen licensed by the department and leased or rented by the cottage food registrant provided that a record be maintained as to the dates the commercial kitchen was used and that ingredients used in the production of cottage foods are transported according to applicable food safety standards and regulations promulgated by the department.

The cottage food products are prepared and produced ready for sale under the following conditions:

Pets are kept out of food preparation and food storage areas at all times;

Cooking facilities shall not be used for domestic food purposes while cottage food products are being prepared;

Garbage is placed and stored in impervious covered receptacles before it is removed from the kitchen, which removal shall be at least once each day that the kitchen is used for cottage food manufacture;

Any laundry facilities that may be in the kitchen shall not be used during cottage food manufacture;

Recipe(s) for each cottage food product with all the ingredients and quantities listed, and processing times and procedures, are maintained in the kitchen for review and inspection;

An affixed label that contains:

Name, address, and telephone number;

The ingredients of the cottage food product, in descending order of predominance by weight or volume;

Allergen information, as specified by federal and state labeling requirements, such as milk, eggs, tree nuts, peanuts, wheat, and soybeans; and

The following statement printed in at least ten-point type in a clear and conspicuous manner that provides contrast to the background label: “Made by a Cottage Food Business Registrant that is not Subject to Routine Government Food Safety Inspection,” unless products have been prepared in a commercial kitchen licensed by the department.

Cottage food manufacture shall be limited to the production of baked goods that do not require refrigeration or time/temperature control for safety, including but not limited to:

Double crust pies;

Yeast breads;

Biscuits, brownies, cookies, muffins; and

Cakes that do not require refrigeration or temperature-controlled environment; and

Other goods as defined by the department.

Each cottage food manufacturer shall be registered with the department of health and shall require a notarized affidavit of compliance, in any form that the department may require, from the applicant that the requirements of this section have been met and the operation of the kitchen shall be in conformity with the requirements of this section. Prior to the initial registration, each cottage food manufacturer is required to successfully complete a Food Safety Manager Course, any American Standards Institute approved food handler course, or any other course approved by the department. A certificate of registration shall be issued by the department upon the payment of a fee as set forth in §

23-1-54

and the submission of an affidavit of compliance. The certificate of registration shall be valid for one year after the date of issuance; provided, however, that the certificate may be revoked by the director at any time for noncompliance with the requirements of the section. The certificate of registration, with a copy of the affidavit of compliance, shall be kept in the kitchen where the cottage food manufacture takes place. The director of health shall have the authority to develop and issue a standard form for the affidavit of compliance to be used by persons applying for a certificate of registration; the form shall impose no requirements or certifications beyond those set forth in this section and §

21-27-1(6)

. No certificates of registration shall be issued by the department prior to November 1, 2022.

No such operation shall engage in consignment or wholesale sales. The following additional locational sales by any such cottage food operation shall be prohibited: (i) Grocery stores; (ii) Restaurants; (iii) Long-term-care facilities; (iv) Group homes; (v) Daycare facilities; and (vi) Schools. Advertising and sales by internet, mail, and phone are permissible, provided the cottage food licensee or their designee shall deliver, in person, to the customer within the state.

Total annual gross sales for a cottage food operation shall not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per calendar year. If annual gross sales exceed the maximum annual gross sales amount allowed, the cottage food registrant shall either obtain a food processor license or cease operations. The director of health shall request documentation to verify the annual gross sales figure of any cottage food operation.

Sales on all cottage foods are subject to applicable sales tax pursuant to §

44-18-7

.

The director of health or designee may inspect a cottage food operation at any time to ensure compliance with the provisions of this section. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the director of health or designee of the director from investigating the registered area of a cottage food operation in response to a foodborne illness outbreak, consumer complaint, or other public health emergency.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 9, § 2, effective June 27, 2022.

21-27-7.
Enforcement — Prosecution of violations.

It shall be the duty of the director to enforce the provisions of this chapter and the regulations adopted in accordance with this chapter and to prosecute all persons guilty of violations of them. In these prosecutions the director shall not be required to enter into any recognizance nor to give surety for costs.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 78, § 31; P.L. 1910, ch. 576, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 85, § 31; P.L. 1930, ch. 1570, § 1; P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 113; G.L. 1938, ch. 260, §§ 1, 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 260, § 7; P.L. 1948, ch. 2026, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-27-7

.

21-27-8.
Obstruction of entry to premises in enforcement of chapter.

No person shall interfere with or obstruct the entrance of the director to any house, structure, vessel, vehicle, or other premises in the discharge of the director’s official duties in connection with the enforcement of this chapter or the regulations adopted in accordance with this chapter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 260, § 8; P.L. 1948, ch. 2026, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-27-8

.

21-27-9.
Penalties for violations.

Persons convicted of violating any of the provisions of this chapter or the regulations adopted in accordance with this chapter shall be punished:

By a term of imprisonment not exceeding three (3) months or by a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) for the first offense;

By a term of imprisonment not exceeding six (6) months or by a fine not exceeding two hundred dollars ($200) for the second offense; and

By a term of imprisonment not exceeding one year or by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) for a third or subsequent offense.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 260, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 260, § 9; P.L. 1948, ch. 2026, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-27-9

.

21-27-10.
Registration of food businesses.

No person shall operate a food business as defined in §

21-27-1

unless he or she annually registers the business with the state director of health; provided, that food businesses conducted by nonprofit organizations, hospitals, public institutions, farmers markets, roadside farm stands, or any municipality shall be exempt from payment of any required fee. Additionally, no license fee shall be required for an establishment that:

Holds a Class C liquor license pursuant to §

3-7-8

; and

Complies with the license limits set forth in §

3-7-8

(b).

In order to set the registration renewal dates so that all activities for each establishment can be combined on one registration instead of on several registrations, the registration renewal date shall be set by the department of health. The registration period shall be for twelve (12) months commencing on the registration renewal date. Any renewal registration fee shall be at the full, annual rate regardless of the date of renewal. Any fee for a first-time application shall have the registration fee pro-rated based upon the date of issuance of registration. If the registration renewal date is changed, the department may make an adjustment to the fees of registered establishments, not to exceed the annual registration fee, in order to implement the changes in registration renewal date. Registrations issued under this chapter may be suspended or revoked for cause. Any registration or license shall be posted in a place accessible and prominently visible to an agent of the director.

Registration with the director of health shall be based upon satisfactory compliance with all laws and regulations of the director applicable to the food business for which registration is required.

The director of health is authorized to adopt regulations necessary for the implementation of this chapter.

Classification for registration shall be as follows:

In-state and out-of-state food processors that sell food in Rhode Island (Wholesale)

Food processors (Retail)

Food service establishments:

50 seats or less

More than 50 seats

Mobile food service units

Industrial caterer or food vending machine commissary

Cultural heritage educational facility

Vending machine sites or location:

Three (3) or less machines

Four (4) to ten (10) machines

Eleven (11) or more machines

Retail markets:

1 to 2 cash registers

3 to 5 cash registers

6 or more cash registers

Retail food peddler (meat, seafood, dairy, and frozen dessert products)

Food warehouses

In no instance, where an individual food business has more than one activity eligible under this chapter for state registration within a single location, shall the business be required to pay more than a single fee for the one highest classified activity listed in subsection (e) of this section; provided, that, where several separate but identically classified activities are located within the same building and under the management and jurisdiction of one person, one fee shall be required. In each of the instances in this subsection, each activity shall be separately registered.

Fees for registration of the above classifications shall be as set forth in §

23-1-54

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 51, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 237, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 276, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 10, art. 9, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 54, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 94, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 55, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 15, § 6; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 4; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 39, § 41; P.L. 2007, ch. 379, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 530, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 9, § 34; P.L. 2014, ch. 435, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 469, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 512, art. 1, § 8; P.L. 2022, ch. 324, § 1, effective July 6, 2022.

21-27-11.
Certification of managers in food safety.

In order to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the public there shall be a certification procedure for managers in food safety and requiring the employment of managers certified in food safety by food establishments.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 393, § 1.

21-27-11.1.
Definitions applicable to §§ 21-27-11 — 21-27-11.13.

As used in §§

21-27-11

—

21-27-11

.13:

“Bed and breakfast” establishment means an owner-occupied residence providing accommodations for a charge to the public in operation for more than ten (10) nights in a twelve (12) month period. Breakfast may be provided only to guests. The total number of individuals served shall not exceed twelve (12), including the owner and any other individuals living or eating on the premises. Bed and breakfast establishments shall not include motels, hotels, or boarding houses.

“Director” refers to the director of the department of health.

“Division” means the division of food protection, the department of health.

“Employee” means any person who works with or without pay in a food establishment.

“Food establishment” means any place where food is prepared and intended for individual portion service, and includes the site at which individual portions are provided. The term includes any such place regardless of whether consumption is on or off the premises and regardless of whether there is a charge for the food. The term includes, but is not limited to, restaurants, caterers, nursing and retirement homes, hospitals, private clubs, industrial cafeterias, public and private educational institutions, and delicatessens in retail food stores that cook and offer prepared food in individual service portions.

“Full-time equivalent” means forty (40) hours a week.

“Itinerant vendor” means a food vending business serving food or drink from any establishment or conveyance without fixed locations and without connection to water supply and sewage disposal systems.

“Manager certified in food safety” means a person certified in this state in accordance with the requirements in this chapter.

“Potentially hazardous foods” means any food or food ingredient, natural or synthetic in a form capable of supporting: (i) the rapid and progressive growth of infectious or toxigenic microorganisms, or (ii) the slower growth of Clostridium botulinum.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 393, § 1.

21-27-11.2.
Application for certification.

Any person who shall desire to be certified in food safety shall submit in writing, on any forms as provided by the division, an application for certification that shall be accompanied by an application fee as set forth in §

23-1-54

, together with any other credentials that the rules and regulations and the division may require. There shall be no requirement for an instructor to hold a bachelor’s degree; provided that the instructor is certified by a nationally accredited food-safety-certification program recognized by the state, including, but not limited to, the ServSafe program of the National Restaurant Association.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 393, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 15, § 7; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 39, § 41; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 9, § 34; P.L. 2016, ch. 478, § 1.

21-27-11.3.
Qualifications for certification.

Qualification for certification pursuant to §§

21-27-11

—

21-27-11.4

, shall be successful completion of an examination and a training course as defined in the regulations. The regulation may include a provision for acceptance of prior training and experience in lieu of a training course for managers currently employed in the food industry. The training course, instructors, and examinations used for certification shall be approved by the division. The passing score for the examination shall be established by the division.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 393, § 1.

21-27-11.4.
Use of “manager certified in food safety”.

No person shall use the title “manager certified in food safety” or in any way, represent themselves as a “manager certified in food safety” unless they shall hold a current certificate as provided in §

21-27-11.2

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 393, § 1.

21-27-11.5.
Recertification — Renewal.

Every holder of a certificate issued pursuant to these sections shall, every five (5) years, present evidence to the division of continued eligibility as established by regulations. All certificates issued pursuant to these sections shall expire every five (5) years on a date as established in the rules and regulations unless sooner suspended or revoked. Application for certification renewal shall be made as described in the rules and regulations. A renewal fee shall be required every five (5) years. Managers of municipal or state food establishments shall be exempt from payment of the fee set forth in this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 393, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 7, § 6.

21-27-11.6.
Requirements of food establishments.

Food establishments which prepare potentially hazardous foods shall employ at least one fulltime manager certified in food safety. Establishments who employ ten (10) or more full-time equivalent employees directly involved in food preparation shall be required to employ two (2) managers certified in food safety. Establishments who primarily serve the elderly and individuals with diminished immune systems shall have a manager certified in food safety present during preparation of all hot potentially hazardous foods.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, assisted living residences, licensed by the director of health pursuant to chapter 17.4 of title 23, which have a licensed capacity of twenty-five (25) or fewer residents and which employ five (5) or fewer full-time equivalent employees involved in preparation and serving of food, shall only be required to employ one full-time manager certified in food safety.

Once a manager certified in food safety terminates employment, establishments shall have sixty (60) days to employ a new manager certified in food safety, or have an individual enrolled in a division approved food manager certification program in food safety.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, assisted living residences, licensed by the director of health pursuant to chapter 17.4 of title 23, which have a licensed capacity of twenty-five (25) or fewer residents and which employ five (5) or fewer full-time equivalent employees involved in preparation and serving of food, shall only have fifteen (15) days to employ a new manager certified in food safety. However said time period may be extended by the division.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 393, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 229, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 318, § 1.

21-27-11.7.
Issuance of certification.

The division shall certify managers in food safety who have met the requirements in §§

21-27-11

—

21-27-11

.13 and in the rules and regulations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 393, § 1.

21-27-11.8.
Exemptions.

The provisions of §§

21-27-11

—

21-27-11

.13 shall not apply to:

Special events sponsored by city or town or nonprofit civic organizations such as, but not limited to, school sporting events, firefighter’s picnics, little league food booths, grange and church suppers, and fairs;

Temporary food services which have a frequency of less than six (6) events a year such as bazaars, bake sales, and suppers. Individuals responsible for temporary food operations preparing potentially hazardous foods shall be required to register with the division, obtain food safety informational brochures, and distribute these materials to the individuals engaged in food preparation for the event;

Itinerant vendors and other food establishments that serve only commercially pre-packaged foods, beverages, and commercially precooked potentially hazardous foods requiring no manual handling of the food product such as frankfurters;

Retail food stores and delicatessens where only cold foods are prepared;

Private homes, and bed and breakfast establishments.

Any private or public housing complex designated by the federal government as housing for the elderly located in this state, in connection with limited, not-for-profit sales of food to residents of the complex.

Private clubs which do not charge the general public for the sale of food or beverages which serve less than twenty (20) at any one time, and serve less than one hundred (100) meals per month.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 393, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 81, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 287, § 1.

21-27-11.9.
Rules and regulations.

The director shall make all necessary rules and regulations for:

The filing of applications for certification;

The qualifications and responsibilities of applicants, training instructors, and managers certified in food safety; and

The administration and enforcement of §§

21-27-11

—

21-27-11

.13.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 393, § 1.

21-27-11.10.
Suspension or revocation of certification/training required.

Manager certification in food safety may be suspended or revoked for repeated violations of the rules and regulations of the state pertaining to food establishments or for preventing health department personnel from performing their duty. The individual shall surrender the certificate to the division when certification has been suspended or revoked. In lieu of suspension of certification, or of the establishment license, mandatory training may be required for managers employed in establishments where there is displayed an inability to maintain safe and sanitary food handling practices as demonstrated by food-borne illnesses, serious repeat violations, or other factors increasing the risk to consumers. The certificate or license holders at that establishment may be required to attend a training program approved by the department and repeat all requirements for certification. Under the conditions specified in this section, the department may also require all of the food establishment staff to attend a training program on food protection approved by the department.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 393, § 1.

21-27-11.11.
Administrative fines.

The division, after due notice and after opportunity for a hearing, shall have the right to levy administrative fines of up to five hundred dollars ($500) against any manager certified in food safety or food establishment who violates the provisions of the rules and regulations governing food establishments.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 393, § 1.

21-27-11.12.
Receipts.

The proceeds of any fees and administrative fines collected pursuant to the provisions of §§

21-27-11

—

21-27-11

.13 shall be deposited as general revenues.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 393, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 56.

21-27-11.13.
Enforcement.

The director of health, or the director’s authorized agents, shall enforce the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 393, § 1.

21-27-12.
Outdoor dining — Dogs permitted.

A restaurant with an outdoor dining area may allow a patron’s dog to accompany the patron in the outdoor dining area during the hours designated by the owner of the restaurant.

The owner of a restaurant:

Shall determine the location and the amount of space in the outdoor dining area designated for a patron accompanied by a dog;

May establish limits on the size and type of dogs and any other limitations relating to dogs that may accompany a patron into the outdoor dining area of a restaurant;

May deny entry to the restaurant or eject from the restaurant any patron accompanied by a dog at the discretion of the owner; and

Shall place on permanent display a written notice that is in a typeface that is large enough to be easily legible to the average person and that is in a location that is plainly visible to the patrons of the restaurant notifying the patrons of the policy of the restaurant allowing dogs in the outdoor dining area.

A patron accompanied by a dog:

Shall not allow the dog to travel through an indoor space of a restaurant to enter or exit an outdoor dining area;

Shall keep the dog on a leash at all times with the patron at the table at which the patron is seated;

Shall not leave the dog unattended at any time in the restaurant;

Shall be an adult who is responsible for the behavior of the dog; and

Shall be liable for any damages caused by the dog to the restaurant or any other patron of the restaurant.

This section shall not affect the right of an individual to use a service animal as provided by the Rhode Island general laws.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 502, § 1.